North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 16. Postmortem Investigation and Disposition.
§ 130A-414.2.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

Anatomical gift. — A donation of all or part of a human body to take effect after the donor’s death for the purpose of transplantation or transfusion.

Auxiliary aids or services. — An aid or service that is used to provide information to an individual with a cognitive, developmental, intellectual, neurological, or physical disability and is available in a format or manner that allows the individual
to better understand the information. An auxiliary aid or service may include any of the following:

Qualified interpreters or other effective methods of making aurally delivered materials available to persons with hearing impairments.

Qualified readers, taped texts, texts in accessible electronic format, or other effective methods of making visually delivered materials available to persons with visual impairments.

Supported decision-making services, including any of the following:

The use of a support individual to communicate information to the individual with a disability, ascertain the wishes of the individual, or assist the individual in making decisions.

The disclosure of information to a legal guardian, authorized representative, or another individual designated by the individual with a disability for such purpose, as long as the disclosure is consistent with State and federal law, including sections
261 through 264 of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended, and any federal regulations adopted to implement these sections.

If an individual has a court-appointed guardian or other individual responsible for making medical decisions on behalf of the individual, any measures used to ensure that the individual is included in decisions involving the individual’s health care and
that medical decisions are in accordance with the individual’s own expressed interests.

Any other aid or service that is used to provide information in a format that is easily understandable and accessible to individuals with cognitive, neurological, developmental, or intellectual disabilities, including assistive communication technology.

Covered entity. — Any licensed provider of health care services, including licensed health care practitioners, hospitals, nursing facilities, laboratories, intermediate care facilities, psychiatric residential treatment facilities, institutions for individuals
with intellectual or developmental disabilities, and prison health centers.

Disability. — As defined in the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12102 et seq., as amended.

Organ transplant. — The transplantation or transfusion of a part of a human body into the body of another for the purpose of treating or curing a medical condition.

Qualified recipient. — Any individual who has a disability and meets the essential eligibility requirements for the receipt of an anatomical gift with or without any of the following:

Individuals or entities available to support and assist the individual with an anatomical gift or transplantation.

Auxiliary aids or services.

Reasonable modifications to the policies, practices, or procedures of a covered entity, including modifications to allow for either or both of the following:

1.
Communication with one or more individuals or entities available to support or assist with the recipient’s care and medication after surgery or transplantation.

2.
Consideration of support networks available to the individual, including family, friends, and home and community-based services, including home and community-based services funded through Medicaid, Medicare,
another health plan in which the individual is enrolled, or any program or source of funding available to the individual, when determining whether the individual is able to comply with post-transplant medical requirements.

History.
2021-64, s. 2(a).

§ 130A-414.3.
Organ transplant discrimination on the basis of disability prohibited.

It is unlawful for a covered entity to do any of the following, solely on the basis of an individual’s disability:

Consider an individual ineligible to receive an anatomical gift or organ transplant.

Deny medical services or other services related to organ transplantation, including diagnostic services, evaluation, surgery, counseling, and post-operative treatment and services.

Refuse to refer the individual to a transplant center or other related specialist for the purpose of being evaluated for or receiving an organ transplant.

Refuse to place a qualified recipient on an organ transplant waiting list.

Place a qualified recipient on an organ transplant waiting list at a lower priority position than the position at which the individual would have been placed if the individual did not have a disability.

Refuse insurance coverage for any procedure associated with being evaluated for or receiving an anatomical gift or organ transplant, including post-transplantation and post-transfusion care.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a covered entity may take an individual’s disability into account when making treatment or coverage recommendations or decisions, solely to the extent that the disability has been found
by a physician or surgeon, following an individualized evaluation of the individual, to be medically significant to the provision of the anatomical gift.

If an individual has the necessary support system to assist the individual in complying with post-transplant medical requirements, a covered entity may not consider the individual’s inability to independently comply with post-transplant medical requirements
to be medically significant for the purposes of subsection (b) of this section.

A covered entity shall make reasonable modifications to its policies, practices, or procedures to allow individuals with disabilities access to transplantation-related services, including diagnostic services, surgery, coverage, post-operative treatment,
and counseling, unless the covered entity can demonstrate that making such modifications would fundamentally alter the nature of such services.

A covered entity shall take steps necessary to ensure that an individual with a disability is not denied medical services or other services related to organ transplantation, including diagnostic services, surgery, post-operative treatment, or counseling,
due to the absence of auxiliary aids or services, unless the covered entity demonstrates that taking these steps would fundamentally alter the nature of the medical services or other services related to organ transplantation or
would result in an undue burden for the covered entity.

The provisions of this section apply to all stages of the organ transplant process.

Nothing in this Part shall be construed to require a covered entity to make a referral or recommendation for or perform a medically inappropriate organ transplant.

History.
2021-64, s. 2(a).

§§ 130A-414.4 through 130A-414.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 130A-414.10.
Enforcement.

Whenever it appears that a covered entity has violated or is violating any of the provisions of this Part, the affected individual may commence a civil action for injunctive and other equitable relief against the covered entity for purposes of enforcing
compliance with this Part. The action may be brought in the district court for the county where the affected individual resides or resided or was denied the organ transplant or referral.

In an action brought under this Part, the court shall give priority on its docket and expedited review, and may grant injunctive or other equitable relief, including any of the following:

Requiring auxiliary aids or services to be made available for a qualified recipient.

Requiring the modification of a policy, practice, or procedure of a covered entity.

Requiring facilities be made readily accessible to and usable by a qualified recipient.

The Court may not award compensatory or punitive damages for violations of this Part.

Nothing in this Part is intended to limit or replace available remedies under the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. § 12102 et seq., as amended, or any other applicable federal or State laws.

History.
2021-64, s. 2(a).

Part 5. Disposition of Unclaimed Bodies.

§ 130A-415.
Unclaimed bodies; bodies claimed by the Lifeguardianship Council of The Arc of North Carolina, Inc.; disposition.

Any person, other than a person licensed as a funeral director or funeral service licensee in this State, including officers, employees, and agents of the State or of any unit of local government in the State, hospitals, nursing homes, or other institutions,
having physical possession of a dead body shall make reasonable efforts to contact relatives of the deceased or other persons who may wish to claim the body for final disposition. If the body remains unclaimed for final disposition,
the person having possession shall notify the Commission of Anatomy. Upon request of the Commission of Anatomy, the person having possession shall deliver the dead body to the Commission of Anatomy at a time and place specified
by the Commission of Anatomy or shall permit the Commission of Anatomy to take and remove the body.

(a1)
A dead body shall be deemed unclaimed if either of the following conditions apply:

No individual notifies the person in possession of the dead body within 10 days of the date of death that the individual wishes to dispose of the dead body.

All individuals who have expressed interest in arranging for disposition of the dead body have (i) ceased communicating with the person in possession of the dead body for five days, (ii) at least 10 days have passed from the date of death, and (iii) the
person in possession of the dead body has used reasonable efforts to contact all individuals interested in arranging for final disposition.

Unless the provisions of subsection (j) of this section apply, all dead bodies not claimed for final disposition within 10 days of the decedent’s death may be received and delivered by the Commission of Anatomy pursuant to the authority contained in

G.S. 130A-33.30

and this Part and in accordance with the rules of the Commission of Anatomy. Upon receipt of a body by the Commission of Anatomy all interests in and rights to the unclaimed dead body shall vest in the Commission
of Anatomy. The recipient to which the Commission of Anatomy delivers the body shall pay all expenses for the embalming and delivery of the body and for the reasonable expenses arising from efforts to notify relatives or others.

(b1) The 10-day periods referenced in subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a1) of this section may be shortened by the county director of social services upon determination that a dead body will not be claimed for final disposition within the 10-day
period.

Unless the provisions of subsection (j) of this section apply, if the Commission of Anatomy declines to receive a dead body, the person with possession shall inform the director of social services of the county that is responsible for the expense of the
final disposition of the decedent. Upon notification, all interests in and rights to the abandoned dead body shall vest in the director of social services of that county, who then shall arrange for prompt final disposition of the
body, either by cremation, hydrolysis, or burial.

(c1) Reasonable costs of disposition and of efforts made to notify relatives and others shall be considered funeral expenses and shall be paid in accordance with

G.S. 28A-19-6

and

G.S. 28A-19-8

. If those expenses cannot be satisfied from the decedent’s estate, they shall be borne by the decedent’s county of residence. If the deceased is not a resident of this State, or if the county of residence is
unknown, those expenses shall be borne by the county in which the death occurred or, if the county of residence and death of the decedent are unknown, the county where the deceased was located.

No autopsy shall be performed on an unclaimed body without the written consent of the Commission of Anatomy except that written consent is not required for an autopsy performed pursuant to Part 2 of this Article.

Due caution shall be taken to shield the unclaimed body from public view.

Notwithstanding this section, an unclaimed body does not mean a dead body for which the deceased has made a gift pursuant to Part 3A of this Article.

Nothing in this Part requires the officers, employees, or agents of a county to notify the Commission of Anatomy regarding the bodies of minors who were in the custody of the county at the time of death and whose final disposition will be arranged by
the county. In the absence of notification, the expenses of the final disposition shall be a charge upon the county having custody.

This Part does not apply to bodies within the jurisdiction of the medical examiner under

G.S. 130A-383

or

G.S. 130A-384

.

In addition to the other duties of the Commission of Anatomy, when the Commission of Anatomy is notified by the Lifeguardianship Council of The Arc of North Carolina, Inc., that the Council intends to claim a body, the Commission shall release the body
to the Council. The Lifeguardianship Council shall notify the Commission of Anatomy within 24 hours after death of its intent to claim a body for burial or other humane and caring disposition.

Any funeral director or funeral service licensee doing business within the State having physical possession of a dead body shall make reasonable efforts to contact relatives of the deceased or other persons who may wish to claim the body for final disposition.
If the body remains unclaimed for final disposition for 10 days, or if the right to authorize the type, method, place, and disposition, of the dead body is waived under

G.S. 130A-420(b1)

or G.S. 90-210.124(b), and if all persons who have expressed interest in arranging for the disposition for the dead body have ceased communication with the person in possession of the dead body for five days, the
dead body shall be deemed abandoned. If the funeral director or funeral service licensee receives the dead body from a person or entity listed in subsection (a) of this section, the 10-day period shall run concurrently with any
period imposed on that person or entity. Any person having possession of an abandoned dead body shall notify the Commission of Anatomy. Upon request of the Commission of Anatomy, the person having possession of the abandoned dead
body shall deliver the abandoned dead body to the Commission of Anatomy at a time and place specified by the Commission of Anatomy or shall permit the Commission of Anatomy to take and remove the abandoned dead body.

If the Commissioner of Anatomy fails to request delivery of the abandoned dead body within two days of receipt of the notification required by subsection (j) of this section, or if the Commissioner of Anatomy declines delivery of the abandoned dead body,
the funeral director or funeral services licensee shall notify the director of social services of the county where the abandoned dead body is located. The notice to the director of social services shall contain a sworn statement
that (i) the body is an abandoned dead body, (ii) reasonable efforts have been made to inform relatives and others of the death, and (iii) the Commission of Anatomy has failed to request or has declined delivery of the abandoned
dead body. Upon receipt of the sworn statement, the director of social services shall arrange for final disposition of the abandoned dead body and all interests in and rights to the abandoned dead body shall vest in the director
of social services, who shall then arrange for prompt final disposition of the abandoned dead body by cremation, hydrolysis, or burial. Upon payment by the director of social services for final disposition of the abandoned dead
body, the director shall have a claim of reasonable funeral expenses which shall be paid in accordance with

G.S. 28A-19-6

and

G.S. 28A-19-8

. If those expenses cannot be satisfied from the decedent’s estate, they shall be borne by the decedent’s county of residence. If the decedent is not a resident of this State, or if the county of residence is unknown,
those expenses shall be borne by the county in which the death occurred, or if the county of residence and death of the decedent is unknown, the county where the deceased was located.

History.
1975, c. 694, s. 3; 1977, c. 458; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 470; 1989, c. 222; c. 770, s. 75; 2008-153, s. 7; 2018-47, s. 10(b); 2018-78, s. 21.

§ 130A-416.
Commission of Anatomy rules.

The Commission of Anatomy is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of this Part.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

Part 6. Final Disposition or Transportation of Deceased Migrant Agricultural Workers and Their Dependents.

§ 130A-417.
Definitions.

The following definitions shall apply throughout this Part:

“Dependent” means child, grandchild, spouse or parent of a migrant agricultural worker who moves with the migrant agricultural worker in response to the demand for seasonal agricultural labor.

“Migrant agricultural worker” means a worker who moves in response to the demand for seasonal agricultural labor.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-418.
Deceased migrant agricultural workers and their dependents.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a person having knowledge of the death of a migrant agricultural worker or a worker’s dependent shall without delay report the death to the department of social services in the county in which the body is located
together with any information regarding the deceased including identity, place of employment, permanent residence, and the name, address and telephone number of any relative and any interested person. The county department of social
services shall, within a reasonable time of receiving this report, transmit to the Department notice of the death and information received upon notification. The Department shall make reasonable effort to inform the next-of-kin
and any interested person of the death.

If the identity of the person cannot be determined within a reasonable period of time, or if the body is unclaimed 10 days after death, the body shall be offered to the Commission of Anatomy and, upon its request, shall be delivered to the Commission
of Anatomy. If the Commission of Anatomy does not request an unclaimed body offered it or the estate, and if the relatives or other interested persons claiming the body are unable to provide for the final disposition of the migrant
agricultural worker or dependent, the Department is authorized and directed to arrange for the final disposition of the decedent.

If the estate, relatives or interested persons are able to provide for final disposition but are unable to effect the transportation of the decedent to the decedent’s legal residence or the legal residence of the relatives or interested persons, the Department
is authorized and directed to allocate a sum of not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00) to defray the transportation expenses.

The Secretary is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

History.
1975, c. 891; 1977, c. 648; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-419.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 7. Disposition of Body or Body Parts.

§ 130A-420.
Authority to dispose of body or body parts.

An individual at least 18 years of age may authorize the type, place, and method of disposition of the individual’s own dead body by methods in the following order:

Pursuant to a preneed funeral contract executed pursuant to Article 13D of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes or pursuant to a cremation authorization form executed pursuant to Article 13C of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

Pursuant to a health care power of attorney to the extent provided in Article 3 of Chapter 32A of the General Statutes.

Pursuant to a written will.

Pursuant to a written statement other than a will signed by the individual and witnessed by two persons who are at least 18 years old.

(a1)
An individual at least 18 years of age may delegate his or her right to dispose of his or her own dead human body to any person by one of the following methods:

(1)
Any means authorized in subsection (a) of this section.

(2)
By completing United States Department of Defense Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, or its successor form. A delegation made by filling out this form shall only be effective if the individual dies
under the circumstances described in 10 U.S.C. § 1481(a)(1) through (8). A delegation under this subdivision takes precedence over any of the methods set forth in this section.

(a2)
Unless expressly prohibited by the order of appointment, a guardian of the person shall have the authority to direct the final disposition of the remains of the ward through the methods authorized in
subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section if executed before the death of the ward.

If a decedent has left no written authorization for the disposal of the decedent’s body as permitted under subsection (a) of this section, the following competent persons in the order listed may authorize the type, method, place, and disposition of the
decedent’s body:

The surviving spouse.

A majority of the surviving children over 18 years of age, who can be located after reasonable efforts.

The surviving parents.

A majority of the surviving siblings over 18 years of age, who can be located after reasonable efforts.

A majority of the persons in the classes of the next degrees of kinship, in descending order, who, under State law, would inherit the decedent’s estate if the decedent died intestate who are at least 18 years of age and can be located after reasonable
efforts.

A person who has exhibited special care and concern for the decedent and is willing and able to make decisions about the disposition.

In the case of indigents or any other individuals whose final disposition is the responsibility of the State or any of its instrumentalities, a public administrator, medical examiner, coroner, State-appointed guardian, or any other public official charged
with arranging the final disposition of the decedent.

In the case of individuals who have donated their bodies to science or whose death occurred in a nursing home or private institution and in which the institution is charged with making arrangements for the final disposition of the decedent, a representative
of the institution.

In the absence of any of the persons described in subdivisions (1) through (8) of this subsection, any person willing to assume responsibility for the disposition of the body.This subsection does not grant to any person the right to cancel a preneed funeral
contract executed pursuant to Article 13D of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes, to prohibit the substitution of a preneed licensee as authorized under

G.S. 90-210.63

, or to permit modification of preneed contracts under

G.S. 90-210.63

A. If an individual is incompetent at the time of the decedent’s death, the individual shall be treated as if he or she predeceased the decedent. An attending physician may certify the incompetence of an
individual and the certification shall apply to the rights under this section only. Any individual under this section may waive his or her rights under this subsection by any written statement notarized by a notary public
or signed by two witnesses.

(b1) A person who does not exercise his or her right to dispose of the decedent’s body under subsection (b) of this section within five days of notification or 10 days from the date of death, whichever is earlier, shall be deemed to have waived his or
her right to authorize disposition of the decedent’s body or contest disposition in accordance with this section. Under G.S. 130A-415(c) or (j), upon such a waiver, and upon the Commission of Anatomy declining or failing
to request delivery of the abandoned dead body, the director of social services of the county in which the dead body is located shall become vested with all interests and rights to the dead body and shall authorize
and arrange for disposition by cremation, hydrolysis, or burial.

(b2) Once the burial of an individual is completed under the provisions of this section, the method and location of disposition shall not be changed unless otherwise authorized by law or by a court order upon a showing of good cause.

An individual at least 18 years of age may, in a writing signed by the individual, authorize the disposition of one or more of the individual’s body parts that has been or will be removed. If the individual does not authorize the disposition, a person
listed in subsection (b) of this section may authorize the disposition as if the individual was deceased.

This section does not apply to the disposition of dead human bodies as anatomical gifts under Part 3A of Article 16 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes or the right to perform autopsies under Part 2 of Article 16 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes.

History.
1997-399, s. 34; 2007-531, s. 26; 2008-153, s. 8; 2010-191, s. 1; 2018-78, s. 22.

§ 130A-421.
Parental consent to disposition of fetal remains.

In every instance of unintended fetal death resulting from accidental injury, stillbirth, or miscarriage, the attending physician or individual in charge of the institution where the fetal remains were expelled or extracted shall obtain consent from the
mother before the disposal of the fetal remains and shall only dispose of the fetal remains by burial, cremation, or incineration in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. If the mother is unable to give consent, and the
father is known and able to be contacted within seven days, the attending physician or individual in charge of the institution where the fetal remains were expelled or extracted shall obtain consent from the father and shall only dispose
of the fetal remains by burial, cremation, or incineration in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. If neither the mother nor the father is able to give consent within seven days from the time the remains were expelled or
extracted, the fetal remains shall only be disposed of by burial, cremation, or incineration in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. Burial or cremation shall be the only method of disposing of fetal remains that have developed
beyond completion of the second trimester of gestation.

History.
2019-225, s. 8(a).